Hawaii, session 2025, GM1413.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
1 SECTION 1. Chapter 261, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
2 amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
3 and to read as follows:
4 ”§261- Hawaii state aircraft rescue fire fighting unit;
5 chief; term limits. (a) The director of transportation shall
6 appoint the fire chief of the Hawaii state aircraft rescue fire
7 fighting unit of the airports division of the department of
8 transportation from a list of three qualified candidates
9 submitted for consideration by the state fire council, subject
10 to the advice and consent of the senate.
11 (b) Each appointed fire chief of the Hawaii state aircraft
12 rescue fire fighting unit of the airports division of the
13 department of transportation shall serve a term of four years.
14 No fire chief shall be appointed to more than two consecutive
15 terms.”
16 SECTION 2. New statutory material is underscored.
17
2025-2907 SB1102 CDl SMA.docx
iiiiHiiHHBiniiinw

Page 2 S.B. NO. s"
C.D. 1
1 SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-2907 SB1102 CDl SMA.docx 2
IlilWIlinilHIIMIIM

S.B. NO 1102
S.
H.
C.
APPROVED this day of , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1
P
P
P
JKJN

S.B. No. 1102, S.D. 2, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
resident
Clerk of the Senate
93

SB No. 1102, SD2, HD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date; April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
-----------------
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives